Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-329
Inspection of records; complaint; commission powers; treatment of records.

(1) The commission or the employees or duly authorized agents of the commission may, in a mutually agreed-upon setting, inspect any records held by a transportation network company which the commission determines are necessary to review to ensure public safety, including information obtained pursuant to section 75-326. Such inspection of records shall occur no more than once each calendar quarter unless the commission finds it necessary pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. Such inspection shall be conducted on an audit basis rather than a comprehensive basis.

(2) In response to a specific complaint, the commission may inspect any records held by a transportation network company which the commission determines are necessary to investigate and resolve the complaint, including information obtained pursuant to section 75-326.

(3) Any records obtained or inspected pursuant to this section shall not be considered public records subject to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 and shall not be subject to disclosure by the commission except when publicly disclosed as evidence in a civil penalty proceeding pursuant to section 75-156 or in a criminal proceeding prosecuted by the state.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 8.